Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1457XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1457XD (16) 91
dg/ko

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
TREATMENT, PHYSICAL ASSESSMENTS, AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
EVALUATIONS
Section 1. Section 125.13, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. k. A licensee under chapter 135H.
Sec. 2. Section 135H.1, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
135H.1 Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Approved qualifying organization” means any of the
following:
a. The joint commission.
b. The commission on accreditation of rehabilitation
facilities.
c. The council on accreditation.
d. A nationally recognized accrediting organization that
operates in conformance with federal regulations and has
accreditation standards comparable to the entities under
paragraphs “a” through “c”.
e. An entity specified by rule promulgated by the department
in consultation with the department of health and human
services.
1. 2. “Department” means the department of inspections,
appeals, and licensing.
2. 3. “Direction” means authoritative policy or procedural
guidance for the accomplishment of a function or an activity.
3. 4. “Licensee” means the holder of a license issued to
operate a psychiatric medical institution for children.
4. 5. “Medical care plan” means a plan of care and services
designed to eliminate the need for inpatient care by improving
the condition of a child youth. Services must be based upon a
diagnostic evaluation, which includes an examination a physical
assessment and behavioral health evaluation of the medical,
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-1- dg/ko 1/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
psychological, social, behavioral, and developmental aspects
of the child’s youth’s situation, reflecting the need for
inpatient care.
6. “Mental health disorder” means any of the following:
a. A mental disorder as defined by the most recent version
of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders
published by the American psychiatric association.
b. A mental disorder as defined in the most recent version
of the international classification of diseases published by
the world health organization.
5. 7. “Mental health professional” means an individual who
has all of the following qualifications:
a. The individual holds at least a master’s degree in a
mental health field, including but not limited to, psychology,
counseling and guidance, nursing, and or social work, or the
individual is a physician.
b. The individual holds a current Iowa license if practicing
in a field covered by that requires an Iowa licensure law
license.
c. The individual has at least two years of post-degree
clinical experience, supervised by another mental health
professional, in assessing mental health needs and problems and
in providing appropriate mental health services.
6. 8. “Nursing care” means services which are provided
under the direction of a physician or registered nurse.
7. 9. “Physician” means a person licensed under chapter
148.
10. “Protective locked environment” means a setting that
prevents egress from a building or grounds as a protective
measure to ensure safety and security.
8. 11. “Psychiatric medical institution for children” or
“psychiatric institution” means an institution providing more
than twenty-four hours of continuous care involving long-term
psychiatric services to three or more children youth in
residence for expected periods of fourteen or more days for
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-2- dg/ko 2/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
diagnosis and evaluation or for expected periods of ninety days
or more for treatment.
9. 12. “Psychiatric services” means services provided under
the direction of a physician which address mental, emotional,
medical, or behavioral problems.
13. “Record check evaluation system” means the same as
defined in section 135C.1.
10. 14. “Rehabilitative services” means services to
encourage and assist restoration of a resident’s optimum mental
and physical capabilities.
11. 15. “Resident” means a person who is less than
twenty-one years of age and youth who has been admitted by a
physician to a psychiatric medical institution for children.
16. “Serious emotional disturbance disorder” means a
diagnosable mental, behavioral, or emotional disorder of
sufficient duration to result in a functional impairment,
and that meets the diagnostic criteria in the most current
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders published
by the American psychiatric association. “Serious emotional
disturbance disorder” does not include a substance use or
developmental disorder unless such disorder co-occurs with a
diagnosable disorder that would otherwise constitute a serious
emotional disturbance disorder.
17. “Substance use disorder” means the same as defined in
section 125.2.
12. 18. “Supervision” means direct oversight and inspection
of the an act of accomplishing that accomplishes a function or
activity.
19. “Youth” means a person who is less than twenty-one years
of age.
Sec. 3. Section 135H.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
135H.3 Nature of care.
1. a. A psychiatric medical institution for children
shall provide shelter, food, supervision, care, evaluation,
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-3- dg/ko 3/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
diagnosis, treatment, counseling, rehabilitative services,
and related professional-directed services to youth who
have a serious emotional disturbance disorder, a substance
use disorder, or both, with the intention of reducing or
ameliorating the disorder, the symptoms of the disorder, or the
effects of the disorder.
b. A psychiatric medical institution for children shall
utilize a team of professionals to direct an organized program
of diagnostic services, psychiatric services, nursing care,
and rehabilitative services to meet the needs of residents
in accordance with a medical care plan developed for each
resident. The membership of the team of professionals
may include but is not limited to an advanced registered
nurse practitioner or a physician assistant. Social and
rehabilitative services shall be provided under the direction
of a qualified mental health professional.
2. If a child youth is diagnosed with a biologically
based mental illness as defined in section 514C.22 and meets
the medical assistance program criteria for admission to a
psychiatric medical institution for children, the child youth
shall be deemed to meet the acuity criteria for medically
necessary inpatient benefits under a group policy, contract, or
plan providing for third-party payment or prepayment of health,
medical, and surgical coverage benefits issued by a carrier, as
defined in section 513B.2, that is subject to section 514C.22.
Such medically necessary benefits shall not be excluded or
denied as care that is substantially custodial in nature under
section 514C.22, subsection 8, paragraph “b”.
Sec. 4. Section 135H.4, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
135H.4 Licensure —— scope of license.
1. A person shall not establish, operate, or maintain a
psychiatric medical institution for children unless the person
obtains a license for the institution under this chapter and
either holds a license under section 237.3, subsection 2,
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-4- dg/ko 4/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
paragraph “a”, as a comprehensive residential facility for
children or holds a license under section 125.13, if the
facility provides substance use disorder treatment.
2. A licensee shall only provide serious emotional
disturbance disorder or substance use disorder services for
which the licensee is licensed under this chapter.
Sec. 5. Section 135H.5, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
135H.5 Application for license —— initial application and
annual fees.
1. An application for a license under this chapter shall
be submitted on a form requesting information required by
the department, which. The application may include require
affirmative evidence of the applicant’s ability to comply with
the rules for standards adopted pursuant to this chapter. The
application shall require the applicant to specify whether the
applicant intends to provide services for serious emotional
disturbance disorders, substance use disorders, or both.
2. An application for a license shall be accompanied by the
required license fee which shall be credited to the general
fund of the state. The initial application fee and the annual
license fee is twenty-five dollars.
Sec. 6. Section 135H.6, subsections 1, 4, and 5, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
1. The department shall issue a license to an applicant
under this chapter if all the following conditions exist:
a. The department has ascertained that the applicant’s
medical facilities and staff are adequate to provide the care
and services required of a psychiatric medical institution for
children.
b. The proposed psychiatric institution is accredited
by the joint commission on the accreditation of health
care organizations, the commission on accreditation of
rehabilitation facilities, the council on accreditation of
services for families and children, or by any other recognized
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-5- dg/ko 5/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
accrediting organization with comparable standards acceptable
under federal regulation an approved qualifying organization.
c. The applicant complies with applicable state rules
and standards for a psychiatric institution adopted by the
department in accordance with federal requirements under 42
C.F.R. §441.150 – 441.156.
d. The department of health and human services has submitted
written approval of the application based on the department
of health and human services’ determination of need. The
department of health and human services shall identify the
location and number of children youth in the state who require
the services of a psychiatric medical institution for children.
Approval of an application shall be based upon the location
of the proposed psychiatric institution relative to the need
for services identified by the department of health and human
services and an analysis of the applicant’s ability to provide
services and support consistent with requirements under chapter
232, particularly regarding specifically community-based
treatment. If the proposed psychiatric institution is not
freestanding from a facility licensed under chapter 135B or
135C, approval under this paragraph shall not be given unless
the department of health and human services certifies that
the proposed psychiatric institution is capable of providing
a resident with a living environment similar to the living
environment provided by a licensee which is freestanding from a
facility licensed under chapter 135B or 135C.
e. The proposed psychiatric institution is under the
direction of an agency which has operated a facility licensed
under section 237.3, subsection 2, paragraph “a”, as a
comprehensive residential facility for children for three years
or of an agency which has operated a facility for three years
providing psychiatric services exclusively to children or
adolescents and the facility meets or exceeds requirements for
licensure under section 237.3, subsection 2, paragraph “a”, as a
comprehensive residential facility for children.
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-6- dg/ko 6/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
f. e. If a child youth has an a serious emotional,
behavioral, or mental health disturbance disorder, the
psychiatric medical institution for children does not require
court any of the following as a condition to obtain treatment
for the youth from the psychiatric institution:
(1) Court proceedings to be initiated or that a child’s.
(2) For the youth’s parent, guardian, or custodian must
to terminate parental rights over, or transfer legal custody
of, the child for the purpose of obtaining treatment from the
psychiatric institution for the child youth. Relinquishment
of a child’s custody shall not be a condition of the child
receiving services.
4. The department of health and human services may give
approval to approve a conversion of beds approved under
subsection 2, to if the beds which are specialized to provide
substance use disorder treatment. However, the total number of
beds approved under subsection 2 and this subsection shall not
exceed four hundred thirty, unless approved for good cause by
the director pursuant to subsection 2. Beds The limitations
on the number of beds under this section shall not apply to
beds for children youth who do not reside in this state and
whose service costs are not paid by public funds in this state
are not subject to the limitations on the number of beds
requirements otherwise applicable under this section.
5. A psychiatric institution licensed prior to July 1, 1999,
may exceed the number of beds authorized under subsection 2
if the excess beds are used to provide services funded from
a source other than the medical assistance program under
chapter 249A. Notwithstanding subsection 1, paragraph “d”, and
subsection 2, the provision of services using those excess beds
does not require a review by the department of health and human
services.
Sec. 7. Section 135H.7, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. If a person who has been convicted of a crime or has a
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-7- dg/ko 7/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
record of founded child abuse is being considered for licensure
under this chapter, or for employment with a psychiatric
institution involving direct responsibility for a child youth
or with access to a child youth when the child youth is alone,
by a licensed psychiatric institution, or if a person will
reside residence in a facility utilized by a licensee, and if
the person has been convicted of a crime or has a record of
founded child abuse, the record check evaluation system and
the licensee for an employee of the licensee considering the
person for employment shall perform an evaluation to determine
whether the crime or founded child abuse warrants prohibition
of licensure, employment, or residence in the facility utilized
by a licensee. The record check evaluation system of the
department of health and human services shall conduct criminal
and child abuse record checks in this state and may conduct
these checks in other states. The record check evaluation
shall be performed in accordance with procedures adopted for
this purpose promulgated by rule by the department of health
and human services.
Sec. 8. NEW SECTION. 135H.7A Protective locked environment
—— rules.
The department, in cooperation with the department of health
and human services, shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
to allow licensees to use a protective locked environment at
the licensees’ facilities.
Sec. 9. Section 135H.10, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. This chapter shall not be construed as prohibiting
the use of to prohibit funds appropriated for foster care to
from being used to provide payment to a psychiatric medical
institution for children for the financial participation
required of a child youth whose foster care placement is in a
psychiatric medical institution for children. In accordance
with established policies and procedures for foster care, the
department of health and human services shall act to recover
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-8- dg/ko 8/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
any such payment for financial participation, apply to be named
payee for the child’s youth’s unearned income, and recommend
parental liability for the costs of a court-ordered foster care
placement in a psychiatric medical institution.
Sec. 10. Section 135H.13, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. The department’s final findings and the survey findings
of the joint commission on the accreditation of health care
organizations an approved qualifying organization regarding
licensure or program accreditation shall be made available
to the public in a readily available form and place. Other
information relating to the psychiatric institution is
confidential and shall not be made available to the public
except in proceedings a proceeding involving licensure, a
civil suit involving a resident, or an administrative action
involving a resident.
Sec. 11. Section 229.13, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
c. (1) If the court orders evaluation and treatment of
the respondent on an inpatient basis under this section, the
court may order the respondent placed under the care of an
appropriate subacute care facility licensed under chapter 135G.
(2) If the court orders evaluation and treatment of a minor
respondent on an inpatient basis under this section, the court
may order the minor respondent placed under the care of a
public hospital.
Sec. 12. Section 229.13, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
5. a. (1) The chief medical officer of the hospital or
facility at which the respondent is placed shall report to the
court and make a recommendation for disposition of the matter
no more than fifteen days after the date the respondent is
placed, making a recommendation for disposition of the matter
at the hospital or facility. An
(2) If the respondent is a minor and is placed under the
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-9- dg/ko 9/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
care of a public hospital pursuant to subsection 1, paragraph
“c”, subparagraph (2), the chief medical officer of the public
hospital shall report to the court and make a recommendation
for disposition no later than thirty calendar days after the
date the minor respondent is placed under the care of the
public hospital.
b. A copy of the chief medical officer’s report shall be
sent to the respondent’s attorney.
c. (1) Upon request, the court may grant the chief medical
officer an extension of time may be granted, not to exceed
seven days, upon a showing of cause. A copy of the report shall
be sent to the The respondent’s attorney, who may contest the
need for an extension of time if one is requested. An
(2) The court shall grant an extension of time shall be
granted upon request unless the request is contested, in which
case the court shall make such inquiry as it deems appropriate
and may either order the respondent’s release from the hospital
or facility, or grant an extension of time for psychiatric
evaluation.
d. If the chief medical officer fails to report to the
court within fifteen days after the individual is placed under
the care of the hospital or facility the time specified in
paragraph “a”, and an extension of time has not been requested
granted, the chief medical officer is guilty of contempt
and shall be punished under chapter 665. The court shall
order a rehearing on the application to determine whether the
respondent should continue to be detained at or placed under
the care of the hospital or facility.
Sec. 13. Section 229.14, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
e. (1) If the court orders placement and treatment of the
a respondent on an inpatient basis under this section, the
court may order the respondent placed under the care of an
appropriate subacute care facility licensed under chapter 135G.
(2) If the court orders placement and treatment of a minor
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-10- dg/ko 10/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
respondent on an inpatient basis under this section, the court
may order the minor respondent placed under the care of a
public hospital.
Sec. 14. Section 232.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3A. “Behavioral health condition” means
a substantial limitation in a major life activity due to
a mental, behavioral, or addictive disorder or condition
diagnosed in accordance with the criteria in the most current
edition of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental
disorders published by the American psychiatric association.
NEW SUBSECTION. 3B. “Behavioral health evaluation” means a
process used to assess an individual’s behavioral health status
and functioning for purposes including but not limited to the
diagnosis of a behavioral health condition or to determine the
need for treatment or intervention.
NEW SUBSECTION. 38A. “Mental health disorder” means the
same as defined in section 135H.1.
NEW SUBSECTION. 48A. “Physical assessment” means
direct physical touching, viewing, and medically necessary
manipulation of any area of a child’s body by a physician
licensed under chapter 148.
NEW SUBSECTION. 58A. “Serious emotional disturbance
disorder” means the same as defined in section 135H.1.
NEW SUBSECTION. 64A. “Substance use disorder” means the
same as defined in section 125.2.
Sec. 15. Section 232.2, subsections 34 and 58, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
34. “Juvenile court social records” or “social records” means
all records, other than official records, made with respect to
a child in connection with proceedings over which the court has
jurisdiction under this chapter other than official records and
includes but is not limited to the records made and compiled
by intake officers, predisposition reports, and reports of
physical assessments and mental examinations behavioral health
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-11- dg/ko 11/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
evaluations.
58. “Secure facility” means a physically restricting
facility in which children adjudicated to have committed
a delinquent act a child may be placed pursuant to a
dispositional order of the court.
Sec. 16. Section 232.8, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
4. In a proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to
have committed a second delinquent act or a second violation
excluded from the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the court
or the juvenile court shall determine whether there is reason
to believe that the child regularly abuses alcohol or other
controlled substance has a behavioral health condition and may
be in need of treatment. If the court so determines, the court
shall advise appropriate juvenile authorities and refer such
offenders to the juvenile court for disposition pursuant to
section 232.52A.
Sec. 17. Section 232.49, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
232.49 Physical assessments and mental examinations
behavioral health evaluations —— juvenile delinquency.
1. a. Following the Any time after entry of an order of
adjudication under section 232.47, the court may, after hold
a hearing which may be simultaneous with the adjudicatory
hearing, to order a physical assessment or mental examination
behavioral health evaluation of the child if it the court finds
that an examination a physical assessment or behavioral health
evaluation is necessary to determine the child’s physical or
mental condition or to determine if the child has a behavioral
health condition.
b. The court may consider chemical dependency as either
a physical condition or mental behavioral health condition
and may consider a chemical dependency evaluation as either a
physical assessment or mental examination behavioral health
evaluation. If the examination
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-12- dg/ko 12/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
c. A hearing to order a physical assessment or behavioral
health evaluation may be held at the same time as the
adjudicatory hearing.
2. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, if a physical
assessment or behavioral health evaluation indicates the child
has behaved in a manner that threatened the safety of another
person, has committed a violent act causing bodily injury to
another person, or has been a victim or perpetrator of sexual
abuse, unless otherwise ordered by the court, the child’s
parent, guardian, or foster parent, or other person with
custody of the child shall be provided with that information.
2. 3. a. When possible an examination, a physical
assessment or behavioral health evaluation shall be conducted
on an outpatient basis, but the. The court may, if it deems
necessary, commit order the child to receive an inpatient
physical assessment or an inpatient behavioral health
evaluation at a suitable hospital, facility, or institution for
the purpose of examination.
b. Commitment for examination an inpatient physical
assessment or an inpatient behavioral health evaluation shall
not exceed thirty days and the civil commitment provisions of
chapter 229 shall not apply.
3. 4. a. At any Any time after the filing of a delinquency
petition, the court may order a physical assessment or mental
examination behavioral health evaluation of the child if all of
the following circumstances apply:
(1) The court finds such examination a physical assessment
or a behavioral health evaluation to be in the best interest
of the child; and.
(2) The parent, guardian, or custodian and the child’s
counsel agree to the physical assessment or behavioral health
evaluation.
b. (1) An examination A physical assessment or behavioral
health evaluation shall be conducted on an outpatient basis
unless the court, the child’s counsel, and the child’s parent,
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-13- dg/ko 13/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
guardian, or custodian agree that it is necessary the child
should be committed to a suitable hospital, facility, or
institution for the purpose of examination ordered to receive
a physical assessment or behavioral health evaluation on an
inpatient basis. Commitment for examination
(2) An inpatient physical assessment or inpatient
behavioral health evaluation shall not exceed thirty days and
the civil commitment provisions of chapter 229 shall not apply.
Sec. 18. Section 232.52A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. In addition to any other order of the juvenile court,
a person under age eighteen, child who may be in need of
treatment, as determined under section 232.8, may be ordered
to participate in an alcohol or controlled substance education
or a physical assessment or behavioral health evaluation
program approved by the juvenile court. If recommended after
evaluation, the The court may also order the person child to
participate in a treatment program approved by the court if the
treatment program is recommended after the child’s physical
assessment or behavioral health evaluation. The juvenile court
may also require the custodial parent or parents, or other
legal guardian, to participate in an educational program with
the person under age eighteen child if the court determines
that such participation is in the best interests of the person
under age eighteen child.
Sec. 19. Section 232.68, subsection 3, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
“Confidential access to a child” means access to a child,
during an assessment of an alleged act of child abuse, who is
alleged to be the victim of the child abuse, during a child
abuse assessment. The access may be accomplished by interview,
observation, or examination physical assessment of the child.
As used in this subsection and this part:
Sec. 20. Section 232.68, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-14- dg/ko 14/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 21. Section 232.69, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. (1) A person required to make a report under subsection
1, other than a physician whose professional practice does not
regularly involve providing primary health care to children,
shall complete the core training curriculum relating to
the identification and reporting of child abuse within six
months of initial employment or self-employment involving
the examination physical assessments or behavioral health
evaluations, or attending, counseling, or treatment of treating
children on a regular basis.
(2) Within one month of initial employment or
self-employment, the person shall obtain a statement of the
abuse reporting requirements from the person’s employer or, if
self-employed, from the department.
(3) The person shall complete the at least one hour of
core training curriculum relating to the identification and
reporting of child abuse every three years.
Sec. 22. Section 232.71B, subsection 10, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
10. Physical examination assessment. If the department
refers a child to a physician or physician assistant for a
physical examination assessment, the department shall contact
the physician or physician assistant regarding the examination
physical assessment within twenty-four hours of making the
referral. If the physician or physician assistant who performs
the examination upon referral by the department physical
assessment reasonably believes the child has been abused, the
physician or physician assistant shall report to the department
within twenty-four hours of performing the examination physical
assessment.
Sec. 23. Section 232.77, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. a. A person who is required to report suspected child
abuse may take or perform, or cause to be taken or performed,
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-15- dg/ko 15/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
at public expense, photographs, X rays, or other a physical
examinations assessment, or tests other test of a child which
would provide medical indication of allegations arising from
an assessment.
b. A health practitioner may, if medically indicated,
cause to be performed a radiological examination, a physical
examination assessment, or other medical tests of test to be
performed on the child.
c. A person who takes any photographs or, takes X rays, or
performs a physical examinations assessment, or other tests
performs another test pursuant to this section shall notify
the department that the photographs or X rays have been taken,
or the examinations physical assessment or other tests have
test has been performed. The person who made notification,
and shall retain the photographs, or X rays or examination,
physical assessment findings, or other test findings for a
reasonable time following the notification.
d. Whenever the a person is required to report under section
232.69, in that person’s capacity as a member of the staff
of a medical or other private or public institution, agency,
or facility, that person shall immediately notify the person
in charge of the institution, agency, or facility, or that
person’s designated delegate, of the need for photographs, or X
rays or examinations, physical assessments, or other tests.
Sec. 24. Section 232.78, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. Any of the following circumstances exist:
(1) The person responsible for the care of the child
consents to the removal.
(2) The person responsible for the care of the child is
absent, or though present,.
(3) The person responsible for the care of the child was
asked and refused to consent to the removal of the child and
was informed of an intent to apply for an order under this
section, or there.
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-16- dg/ko 16/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
(4) There is reasonable cause to believe that a request for
consent would further endanger the child, or there.
(5) There is reasonable cause to believe that a request for
consent will cause the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
person responsible for the care of the child to take flight
with the child.
Sec. 25. Section 232.78, subsection 1, paragraph c,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) The refusal or failure of the person responsible for
the care of the child to comply with the request of a peace
officer, juvenile court officer, or child protection worker
for such the person to obtain and provide to the requester
the results of a physical assessment or mental examination
behavioral health evaluation of the child. The request for a
physical examination assessment of the child may specify the
performance of a medically relevant test.
Sec. 26. Section 232.78, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
5. The juvenile court, before or after the filing of a
petition under this chapter, may enter an ex parte order
authorizing a physician or physician assistant or hospital to
conduct an inpatient or outpatient physical examination or
authorizing a physician or physician assistant, a psychologist
certified under section 154B.7, or a community mental health
center accredited pursuant to chapter 230A to conduct an
outpatient mental examination assessment or an inpatient or
outpatient behavioral health evaluation of a child if necessary
to identify the nature, extent, and cause of injuries to the
child as required by section 232.71B, provided all of the
following apply:
a. Any of the following circumstances exist:
(1) The child’s parent, guardian, or custodian consents to
the physical assessment or behavioral health evaluation.
(2) The child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian is
absent, or though present,.
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-17- dg/ko 17/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
(3) The child’s parent, guardian, or custodian was asked and
refused to provide written consent to the examination physical
assessment or behavioral health evaluation.
b. The juvenile court has entered an ex parte order
directing the removal of the child from the child’s home or a
child care facility under this section.
c. There is not enough sufficient time to file a petition
and to hold a hearing as provided in section 232.98.
Sec. 27. Section 232.79, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. There is not enough sufficient time to apply for an order
under section 232.78.
Sec. 28. Section 232.79, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
5. When there has been an emergency removal or keeping of a
child without a court order, a physical examination assessment
of the child by a licensed medical practitioner shall be
performed within twenty-four hours of such the emergency
removal or keeping of a child, unless the child is returned
to the child’s home within twenty-four hours of the emergency
removal or keeping of a child.
Sec. 29. Section 232.83, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. Anyone authorized to conduct a preliminary investigation
in response to a complaint may apply for, or the court on its
own motion may enter, an ex parte order authorizing a physician
or physician assistant or hospital to conduct an inpatient or
outpatient physical examination or authorizing a physician or
physician assistant, a psychologist certified under section
154B.7, or a community mental health center accredited pursuant
to chapter 230A to conduct an outpatient mental examination
of a child if necessary to identify the nature, extent, and
causes of any injuries, emotional damage, or other such needs
of a child as specified in section 232.96A, subsection 3, 5, or
6, assessment or an inpatient or outpatient behavioral health
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-18- dg/ko 18/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
evaluation provided that all of the following apply:
a. Any of the following circumstances exist:
(1) The parent, guardian, or custodian consents to the
physical assessment or behavioral health evaluation.
(2) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is absent, or
though present,.
(3) The parent, guardian, or custodian was asked and refused
to authorize the examination physical assessment or behavioral
health evaluation.
b. There is not enough sufficient time to file a petition
and hold a hearing under this chapter.
c. The parent, guardian, or legal custodian has not provided
care and treatment related to their the child’s alleged
victimization.
Sec. 30. Section 232.98, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
232.98 Physical and mental examinations assessments and
behavioral health evaluations —— child in need of assistance.
1. a. Except as provided in section 232.78, subsection 5,
a physical assessment or mental examination behavioral health
evaluation of the a child may be ordered only after the filing
of a petition pursuant to section 232.87, and after a hearing
to determine whether an examination a physical assessment
or behavioral health evaluation is necessary to determine
the child’s physical condition or mental if the child has a
behavioral health condition.
b. The court may consider chemical dependency as either
a physical or mental behavioral health condition and may
consider a chemical dependency evaluation as either a physical
assessment or mental examination behavioral health evaluation.
a. c. The hearing required by this section may be held
simultaneously with the adjudicatory hearing.
b. d. An examination A physical assessment or behavioral
health evaluation ordered prior to the adjudication shall
be conducted on an outpatient basis when possible, but if
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-19- dg/ko 19/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
necessary, the court may commit order the child to a suitable
nonsecure receive an inpatient physical assessment or inpatient
behavioral health evaluation at a hospital, facility, or
institution for the purpose of examination for a period not to
exceed fifteen thirty days if all of the following are found to
be present circumstances exist:
(1) Probable cause exists to believe that the child is
a child in need of assistance pursuant to section 232.96A,
subsection 5 or 6.
(2) Commitment An inpatient physical assessment or
inpatient behavioral health evaluation is necessary to
determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence that
the child is a child in need of assistance.
(3) The child’s attorney agrees to the commitment an
inpatient physical assessment or inpatient behavioral health
evaluation.
c. e. An examination A physical assessment or behavioral
health evaluation ordered after adjudication shall be conducted
on an outpatient basis when possible, but if necessary, the
court may commit order the child to a suitable nonsecure
receive an inpatient physical assessment or inpatient
behavioral health evaluation at a hospital, facility, or
institution for the purpose of examination for a period not to
exceed thirty days.
d. f. The child’s parent, guardian, or custodian shall
be included in counseling sessions offered during the child’s
stay in a hospital, facility, or institution when feasible, and
when in the best interests of the child and the child’s parent,
guardian, or custodian. If separate counseling sessions are
conducted for the child and the child’s parent, guardian, or
custodian, a joint counseling session shall be offered prior
to the release of the child from the hospital, facility, or
institution. The court shall require that notice be provided
to the child’s guardian ad litem of the counseling sessions,
and of the counseling session participants, and results the
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-20- dg/ko 20/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
outcomes of the counseling sessions.
2. Following an adjudication that a child is a child in
need of assistance, the court may, after a hearing, order the
a physical assessment or mental examination behavioral health
evaluation of the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian if
that person’s ability to care for the child is at issue.
Sec. 31. Section 232.102, subsection 5, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
5. a. The child shall not be placed in the state training
school.
b. (1) Paragraph “a” shall not be construed to prohibit the
court from ordering a child to receive an inpatient physical
assessment, an inpatient behavioral health evaluation, or both,
at the state training school upon the department’s request at a
hearing under section 232.98.
(2) An inpatient physical assessment or inpatient
behavioral health evaluation of a child conducted at a facility
on the state training school campus shall not exceed thirty
days.
(3) A child ordered to receive an inpatient physical
assessment or an inpatient behavioral health evaluation at the
state training school shall be separated at all times from
children ordered to be placed in the state training school.
(4) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
to administer this paragraph.
Sec. 32. Section 232.127, subsection 7, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
7. a. The court may shall not order the child placed on
probation, in a foster home, or in a nonsecure facility unless
the child requests and agrees to such supervision or placement.
In no event shall the
b. The court shall not order the child placed in the state
training school or other secure facility.
c. (1) Paragraph “b” shall not be construed to prohibit the
court from ordering a child to receive an inpatient physical
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-21- dg/ko 21/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
assessment, an inpatient behavioral health evaluation, or both,
at the state training school upon the department’s request at a
hearing under section 232.98.
(2) An inpatient physical assessment or inpatient
behavioral health evaluation of a child conducted at a facility
on the state training school campus shall not exceed thirty
days.
(3) A child ordered to receive an inpatient physical
assessment or an inpatient behavioral health evaluation at the
state training school shall be separated at all times from
children ordered to be placed in the state training school.
(4) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
to administer this paragraph.
Sec. 33. Section 232.141, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided by law, the court shall
inquire into the ability of the child or the child’s parent
to pay expenses incurred pursuant to subsections 2, 4, and
8. After giving the parent a reasonable opportunity to be
heard, the court may order the parent to pay all or part of the
costs of the child’s care, examination physical assessment,
behavioral health evaluation, treatment, legal expenses, or
other expenses. An order entered under this section does not
obligate a parent paying child support under a custody decree,
except that part of the monthly support payment may be used to
satisfy the obligations imposed by the order entered pursuant
to this section. If a parent fails to pay as ordered, without
good reason, the court may proceed against the parent for
contempt and may inform the county attorney who shall proceed
against the parent to collect the unpaid amount. Any payment
ordered by the court shall be a judgment against each of the
child’s parents and a lien as provided in section 624.23. If
all or part of the amount that the parents are ordered to pay is
subsequently paid by the county or state, the judgment and lien
shall thereafter be against each of the parents in favor of the
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-22- dg/ko 22/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
county to the extent of the county’s payments and in favor of
the state to the extent of the state’s payments.
Sec. 34. Section 232.141, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. Expenses for mental or physical examinations assessments
or behavioral health evaluations of a child if ordered by the
court.
Sec. 35. Section 232.141, subsection 6, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
6. If a child is given A physical or mental examinations
assessment, behavioral health evaluation, or any treatment
relating to an assessment performed pursuant to conducted
under section 232.71B, shall be paid by the state if the
physical assessment, behavioral health evaluation, or other
treatment was performed with the consent of the child’s parent,
guardian, or legal custodian and no other provision of law
otherwise requires payment for the costs of the examination and
treatment, the costs shall be paid by the state. Reimbursement
for The department shall reimburse costs of services described
in under this subsection is subject to in accordance with
subsection 5.
Sec. 36. Section 237.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 8A. “Protective locked environment” means a
setting that prevents egress from a building or grounds as a
protective measure to ensure safety and security.
Sec. 37. Section 237.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 13. The department shall adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 17A relating to the use of a protective
locked environment.
Sec. 38. Section 237.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 9. A licensee under chapter 135H.
Sec. 39. Section 237C.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-23- dg/ko 23/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 5. “Protective locked environment” means a
setting that prevents egress from a building or grounds as a
protective measure to ensure safety and security.
Sec. 40. Section 237C.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 6A. The department shall adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 17A relating to the use of a protective
locked environment.
Sec. 41. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ——
DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING ——
ADMINISTRATIVE RULES.
1. The department of health and human services and the
department of inspections, appeals, and licensing shall each
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this division
of this Act. The departments shall coordinate in their
respective rulemaking processes to ensure each department’s
rules properly implement the duties of that department while
functioning in concert with the rules of the other department.
Rules adopted by each department shall allow individuals to
fully utilize the array of behavioral health services available
through the state.
2. a. Rules relating to residential facilities for
individuals under twenty-one years of age under chapters 135H,
237, and 237C shall include the following:
(1) To the extent possible, uniform application of
rules relating to the use of restraints and seclusion at a
psychiatric medical institution for children subject to chapter
135H, a facility subject to chapter 237, or a children’s
residential facility subject to chapter 237C.
(2) The identification of unmet care needs at psychiatric
medical institutions for children, foster care facilities, and
children’s residential facilities, and adaptation of licensing
and certification requirements to provide for the unmet care
needs.
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-24- dg/ko 24/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
b. When adopting rules pursuant to this subsection, each
department shall consider the nature of the services and
programming provided by psychiatric medical institutions
for children, child foster care facilities, and children’s
residential facilities and applicable federal requirements
including those for psychiatric residential treatment
facilities as described in 42 C.F.R. §483.352.
3. The department of health and human services shall adopt
rules pursuant to chapter 17A relating to the application of
a protective locked environment to detention and shelter care
as those terms are defined in section 232.2. For the purposes
of this subsection, “protective locked environment” means a
setting that prevents egress from a building or grounds as a
protective measure to ensure safety and security.
Sec. 42. REPEAL. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1161, sections 97
and 98, are repealed.
DIVISION II
EXEMPTION FROM CHILDREN’S RESIDENTIAL FACILITY CERTIFICATION
Sec. 43. Section 237C.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. j. Care furnished by a live-in facility that
provides intensive medical care and support for individuals who
require ongoing treatment if all of the following apply:
(1) The facility only furnishes care to persons sixteen
years of age and older.
(2) The department pays for each person’s care from the
facility under a federally approved home and community-based
services waiver, or under chapter 249A.
DIVISION III
DIRECTOR OF JUVENILE COURT SERVICES —— CHIEF JUVENILE COURT
OFFICERS
Sec. 44. Section 602.1101, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 5A. “Director of juvenile court services”
means the same as defined in the Iowa court rules of juvenile
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-25- dg/ko 25/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
court services directed programs as prescribed by the supreme
court.
Sec. 45. Section 602.1217, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
602.1217 Chief juvenile court officer.
1. The chief judge of director of juvenile court services
shall appoint a chief juvenile court officer for each judicial
district, after consultation with the judges of the judicial
district, shall appoint a chief juvenile court officer and may
remove the a chief juvenile court officer for cause.
2. The chief juvenile court officer is subject to the
immediate supervision and direction of the chief judge of the
judicial district director of juvenile court services.
3. The chief juvenile court officer, in addition to
performing the duties of a juvenile court officer, shall
supervise juvenile court officers and administer juvenile court
services within the judicial district in a uniform manner,
under the supervision and direction of the director of juvenile
court services, in accordance with applicable law and with the
rules, and in accordance with the directives, and procedures of
the judicial branch and the judicial district.
4. The chief juvenile court officer shall assist the state
court administrator and the district court administrator
director of juvenile court services in implementing
administrative rules, directives, and procedures of the
judicial branch and the judicial district.
5. A chief juvenile court officer shall have other duties
as prescribed by the supreme court or by the chief judge of the
judicial district director of juvenile court services.
Sec. 46. Section 602.7201, subsection 3, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
3. The chief juvenile court officer may employ, shall
supervise, and may remove for cause with due process
secretarial, clerical, and other staff within juvenile court
service offices as authorized by the chief judge director of
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-26- dg/ko 26/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
juvenile court services.
Sec. 47. Section 602.7202, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
1. Subject to the approval of the chief judge of the
judicial district, the The chief juvenile court officer shall
appoint juvenile court officers to serve the juvenile court.
Juvenile court officers may be required to serve in two or more
counties within the judicial district.
3. Juvenile court officers shall have the duties prescribed
in chapter 232, subject to the direction of the judges of the
juvenile court director of juvenile court services. A judge
of the juvenile court shall not attempt to direct or influence
a juvenile court officer in the performance of the officer’s
duties.
DIVISION IV
HAWKI ELIGIBILITY —— PUBLIC INSTITUTION INMATES
Sec. 48. Section 514I.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 9A. “Public institution” means the same as
defined in 42 C.F.R. §435.1010.
Sec. 49. Section 514I.8, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
g. Is not an inmate of a public institution or a patient in
an institution for mental diseases.
Sec. 50. NEW SECTION. 514I.8B Inmates —— suspension of
Hawki program eligibility.
1. The department shall suspend, but not terminate, Hawki
program eligibility for an eligible child who is described by
all of the following:
a. Thirty calendar days have elapsed since the date the
eligible child was committed to a public institution.
b. The eligible child is an inmate of a public institution.
c. The eligible child was enrolled in Hawki at the time the
eligible child was committed to the public institution.
d. The eligible child remains eligible for the Hawki program
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-27- dg/ko 27/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
except for the eligible child’s status as an inmate of a public
institution.
2. Suspension of an eligible child’s Hawki program
eligibility under subsection 1 shall continue during the
entire period of the eligible child’s commitment to the public
institution.
3. To the extent possible, the public institution to which
an eligible child is committed and the department shall comply
with reporting requirements, and expedite the restoration of
an eligible child’s medical assistance benefits, in a manner
consistent with section 249A.38, upon the eligible child’s
discharge from the public institution.
4. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
to administer this section.
DIVISION V
CORRECTIVE CHANGES
Sec. 51. Section 125.13, subsection 2, paragraphs a, i, and
j, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
a. A hospital providing care or treatment to persons with
a substance use disorder licensed under chapter 135B which is
accredited by the joint commission on the accreditation of
health care organizations, the commission on accreditation
of rehabilitation facilities, the American osteopathic
association, or another recognized organization approved by
the department. All survey reports from the accrediting or
licensing body must be sent to the department.
i. A substance use disorder treatment program not funded
by the department which is accredited or licensed by the joint
commission on the accreditation of health care organizations,
the commission on the accreditation of rehabilitation
facilities, the American osteopathic association, or another
recognized organization approved by the department. All survey
reports from the accrediting or licensing body must be sent to
the department.
j. A hospital substance use disorder treatment program
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-28- dg/ko 28/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
that is accredited or licensed by the joint commission on the
accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on
the accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, the American
osteopathic association, or another recognized organization
approved by the department. All survey reports for the
hospital substance use disorder treatment program from the
accrediting or licensing body shall be sent to the department.
Sec. 52. Section 125.43A, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
125.43A Prescreening —— exception.
Except in cases of medical emergency or court-ordered
admissions, a person shall be admitted to a state mental
health institute for treatment of a substance use disorder
only after a preliminary intake and assessment by a
department-licensed treatment facility or a hospital providing
care or treatment for persons with a substance use disorder
licensed under chapter 135B and accredited by the joint
commission on the accreditation of health care organizations,
the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities,
the American osteopathic association, or another recognized
organization approved by the department, or by a designee of
a department-licensed treatment facility or a hospital other
than a state mental health institute, which confirms that the
admission is appropriate to the person’s substance use disorder
service needs. A county board of supervisors may seek an
admission of a patient to a state mental health institute who
has not been confirmed for appropriate admission and the county
shall be responsible for one hundred percent of the cost of
treatment and services of the patient.
Sec. 53. Section 135B.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
135B.12 Confidentiality.
The department’s final findings or the final survey findings
of the joint commission on the accreditation of health care
organizations or the American osteopathic association with
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-29- dg/ko 29/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
respect to compliance by a hospital or rural emergency hospital
with requirements for licensing or accreditation shall be made
available to the public in a readily available form and place.
Other information relating to a hospital or rural emergency
hospital obtained by the department which does not constitute
the department’s findings from an inspection of the hospital
or rural emergency hospital or the final survey findings of
the joint commission on the accreditation of health care
organizations or the American osteopathic association shall
not be made available to the public, except in proceedings
involving the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license
under this chapter. The name of a person who files a complaint
with the department shall remain confidential and shall not
be subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of legal
compulsion for its release to a person other than department
employees or agents involved in the investigation of the
complaint.
Sec. 54. Section 135B.20, subsection 4, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
4. “Joint conference committee” shall mean the joint
conference committee as required by the joint commission on
accreditation of health care organizations or, in a hospital
having no such committee, a similar committee, an equal number
of which shall be members of the medical staff selected by the
staff and an equal number of which shall be selected by the
governing board of the hospital.
Sec. 55. Section 135C.2, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
7. The rules adopted by the department regarding nursing
facilities shall provide that a nursing facility may choose
to be inspected either by the department or by the joint
commission on accreditation of health care organizations.
The rules regarding acceptance of inspection by the joint
commission on accreditation of health care organizations shall
include recognition, in lieu of inspection by the department,
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-30- dg/ko 30/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
of comparable inspections and inspection findings of the joint
commission on accreditation of health care organizations,
if the department is provided with copies of all requested
materials relating to the inspection process.
Sec. 56. Section 135C.6, subsection 10, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
10. Notwithstanding section 135C.9, nursing facilities
which are accredited by the joint commission on accreditation
of health care organizations shall be licensed without
inspection by the department, if the nursing facility has
chosen to be inspected by the joint commission on accreditation
of health care organizations in lieu of inspection by the
department.
Sec. 57. Section 232.2, subsection 4, paragraph i, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
i. If reasonable efforts to place a child for adoption or
with a guardian are made concurrently with reasonable efforts
as defined in section 232.102 232.102A, the concurrent goals
and timelines may be identified. Concurrent case permanency
plan goals for reunification, and for adoption or for other
permanent out-of-home placement of a child shall not be
considered inconsistent in that the goals reflect divergent
possible outcomes for a child in an out-of-home placement.
Sec. 58. Section 232.36, subsection 3, paragraph b,
subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Legal custodian Custodian of the child.
Sec. 59. Section 232.37, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. Notice of the pendency of the case shall be served upon
the known parents, guardians, or legal custodians of a child
if these persons are not summoned to appear as provided in
subsection 1. Notice shall also be served upon the child and
upon the child’s guardian ad litem, if any. The notice shall
attach a copy of the petition and shall give notification of
the right to counsel provided for in section 232.11.
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-31- dg/ko 31/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 60. Section 232.101A, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
c. The parent of the child does not appear at the
dispositional hearing, or the parent appears at the
dispositional hearing, does not object to the transfer of
guardianship, and agrees to waive the requirement for making
reasonable efforts as defined in section 232.102 232.102A.
Sec. 61. Section 232.102A, subsection 3, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
3. The performance of reasonable efforts to place a child
for adoption or with a guardian may be made concurrently with
making reasonable efforts as defined in this section.
Sec. 62. Section 232B.5, subsection 19, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
A party seeking an involuntary foster care placement of
or termination of parental rights over an Indian child shall
provide evidence to the court that active efforts have been
made to provide remedial services and rehabilitative programs
designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family and that
these efforts have proved unsuccessful. The court shall not
order the placement or termination, unless the evidence of
active efforts shows there has been a vigorous and concerted
level of casework beyond the level that typically constitutes
reasonable efforts as defined in sections 232.57 and 232.102
232.102A. Reasonable efforts shall not be construed to be
active efforts. The active efforts must be made in a manner
that takes into account the prevailing social and cultural
values, conditions, and way of life of the Indian child’s
tribe. Active efforts shall utilize the available resources
of the Indian child’s extended family, tribe, tribal and
other Indian social service agencies, and individual Indian
caregivers. Active efforts shall include but are not limited
to all of the following:
Sec. 63. Section 233.2, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
LSB 1457XD (16) 91
-32- dg/ko 32/38

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
5. Reasonable efforts, as defined in section 232.102
232.102A, that are made in regard to the newborn infant shall
be limited to the efforts made in a timely manner to finalize a
permanency plan for the newborn infant.
Sec. 64. Section 237.3, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
7. If an agency is accredited by the joint commission on
the accreditation of health care organizations under the joint
commission’s consolidated standards for residential settings
or by the council on accreditation of services for families
and children, the department shall modify facility licensure
standards applied to the agency in order to avoid duplicating
standards applied through accreditation.